Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1036.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1901(d)(2) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended July 15, 2024 (P.L.737, No.60), is amended and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1901. Exemption of persons, entities and vehicles from fees.* * *(c) Processing fee in lieu of registration fee.--No registration fee shall be charged for vehicles registered by any of the following but the department shall charge a fee of $10 to cover the costs of processing for issuing or renewing the registration:* * *(24) An active volunteer first responder who uses his or 123456789101112131415161718 her vehicle to respond to emergencies as a member of an emergency medical services company, a volunteer fire company or a volunteer rescue service. The active volunteer first responder must be the owner and principal driver of the vehicle but may from time to time authorize another person to drive the vehicle in his or her stead. For the purposes of this paragraph, the terms "emergency medical services company," "volunteer fire company" and "volunteer rescue service" shall have the meanings given to them in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7363 (relating to definitions).(d) Limitations.--* * *(2) Only one passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 9,000 pounds may be registered to any person under the provisions of subsection (b)(4), (6), (7) and (8) and subsection (c)(16) and (24).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1036PN1120 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718